Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2109.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) Any public utility that authorizes a law enforcement
agency or enters into an agreement with a law enforcement agency to
authorize the law enforcement agency to attach, access, operate,
maintain or remove law enforcement equipment on any utility pole or
other structure that is owned or operated by the public utility shall be
immune from liability in any civil action that is based upon or arises
from such authorization or agreement.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) "Law enforcement agency" means a city police department, a
county sheriff's department or a county police department.
(2) "Public utility" means any public utility as defined in K.S.A.
66-104, and amendments thereto, municipally owned or operated
public utility or electric cooperative public utility.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the House, and passed
that body
HOUSE concurred in
SENATE amendments
__________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House.
Chief Clerk of the House.
Passed the SENATE
as amended
President of the Senate.
Secretary of the Senate.
APPROVED ____________________________________________
Governor.